New York, session 2025-2026, S9148.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 313 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 1-d to read as follows: 3 1-d. In addition to the goals and requirements set forth in subdivi- 4 sion one of this section, each agency letting contracts for the hiring 5 of property managers for residential and commercial buildings shall 6 structure procurement goals for such contracts that include the award of 7 thirty percent of such contracts to minority and women-owned business 8 enterprises. The director shall promulgate rules and regulations to 9 enforce the provisions of this subdivision. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 11 the provisions of section one of this act shall apply to state contracts 12 executed and entered into on or after January 1, 2024 and shall exclude 13 such contracts that have been previously awarded or have pending bids or 14 pending requests for proposals issued prior to such date; and provided, 15 further, that: the amendments to section 313 of the executive law, made 16 by section one of this act shall not affect the expiration of such 17 section and shall expire and be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11071-01-5